North Carolina statutes. Chapter 6. Liability for Court Costs.
Article 3. Civil Actions and Proceedings.
§ 6-32.
Costs against assignee after action brought.

In actions in which the cause of action becomes by assignment after the commencement of the action, or in any other manner, the property of a person not a party to the action, such person shall be liable for the costs in the same manner as if he were a party.

History.

Code, s. 539; Rev., s. 1278; C.S., s. 1255.